Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-564
Self-insurer; certificate; cancellation; hearing; grounds.

Upon not less than five days' notice and a hearing pursuant to such notice, the department may cancel a certificate of self-insurance upon reasonable grounds. Failure to pay any judgment within thirty days after such judgment shall have become final shall constitute a reasonable ground for the cancellation of a certificate of self-insurance.

Laws 1949, c. 178, § 64, p. 503.